data/spelling-dict/hunspell/pt_BR.aff
SFX o   r        ste-nos         perder
SFX o   r        ste-o           perder
SFX o   r        ste-os          perder
SFX o   r        ste-se          perder
SFX o   r        ste-te          perder
SFX o   r        ste-vos         perder
SFX o   r        u-a             perder
SFX o   r        u-as            perder
SFX o   r        u-lhe           perder
SFX o   r        u-lhes          perder
SFX o   r        u-me            perder
SFX o   r        u-nos           perder
SFX o   r        u-o             perder
SFX o   r        u-os            perder
SFX o   r        u-se            perder
SFX o   r        u-te            perder
SFX o   r        u-vos           perder
SFX o   er       i-a             perder
SFX o   er       i-as            perder
SFX o   er       i-lhe           perder
SFX o   er       i-lhes          perder
SFX o   er       i-me            perder
SFX o   er       i-nos           perder
SFX o   er       i-o             perder
SFX o   er       i-os            perder
SFX o   er       i-te            perder
SFX o   er       i-vos           perder
SFX o   er       ia-a            perder
SFX o   er       ia-as           perder
SFX o   er       ia-lhe          perder
SFX o   er       ia-lhes         perder
SFX o   er       ia-me           perder
SFX o   er       ia-nos          perder
SFX o   er       ia-o            perder
SFX o   er       ia-os           perder
SFX o   er       ia-se           perder
SFX o   er       ia-te           perder
SFX o   er       ia-vos          perder
SFX o   er       iam-lhe         perder
SFX o   er       iam-lhes        perder
SFX o   er       iam-me          perder
SFX o   er       iam-na          perder
SFX o   er       iam-nas         perder
SFX o   er       iam-no          perder
SFX o   er       iam-nos         perder
SFX o   er       iam-se          perder
SFX o   er       iam-te          perder
SFX o   er       iam-vos         perder
SFX o   er       íamos-lhe       perder
SFX o   er       íamos-lhes      perder
SFX o   er       íamo-nos       perder
SFX o   er       íamos-vos       perder
SFX o   er       ido-a           perder
SFX o   er       ido-as          perder
SFX o   er       ido-lhe         perder
SFX o   er       ido-lhes        perder
SFX o   er       ido-me          perder
SFX o   er       ido-nos         perder
SFX o   er       ido-o           perder
SFX o   er       ido-os          perder
SFX o   er       ido-se          perder
SFX o   er       ido-te          perder
SFX o   er       ido-vos         perder
SFX o   rer      ira-a           requerer
SFX o   rer      ira-as          requerer
SFX o   rer      ira-lhe         requerer
SFX o   rer      ira-lhes        requerer
SFX o   rer      ira-me          requerer
SFX o   rer      ira-nos         requerer
SFX o   rer      ira-o           requerer
SFX o   rer      ira-os          requerer
SFX o   rer      ira-se          requerer
SFX o   rer      ira-te          requerer
SFX o   rer      ira-vos         requerer
SFX o   rer      iram-lhe        requerer
SFX o   rer      iram-lhes       requerer
SFX o   rer      iram-me         requerer
SFX o   rer      iram-na         requerer
SFX o   rer      iram-nas        requerer
SFX o   rer      iram-no         requerer
SFX o   rer      iram-nos        requerer
SFX o   rer      iram-se         requerer
SFX o   rer      iram-te         requerer
SFX o   rer      iram-vos        requerer
SFX o   rer      iramo-nos       requerer
SFX o   rer      iramos-vos       requerer
SFX o   rer      iramos-lhe      requerer
SFX o   rer      iramos-lhes     requerer
SFX o   rer      iramos-te       requerer
SFX o   rer      iro-a           requerer
SFX o   rer      iro-as          requerer
SFX o   rer      iro-lhe         requerer
SFX o   rer      iro-lhes        requerer
SFX o   rer      iro-me          requerer
SFX o   rer      iro-o           requerer
SFX o   rer      iro-os          requerer
SFX o   rer      iro-te          requerer
SFX o   rer      iro-vos         requerer
SFX o   er       -se             requerer
SFX o   er       ido-a           requerer
SFX o   er       ido-as          requerer
SFX o   er       ido-lhe         requerer
SFX o   er       ido-lhes        requerer
SFX o   er       ido-me          requerer
SFX o   er       ido-nos         requerer
SFX o   er       ido-o           requerer
SFX o   er       ido-os          requerer
SFX o   er       ido-se          requerer
SFX o   er       ido-te          requerer
SFX o   er       ido-vos         requerer
SFX o   r        i-a             requerer
SFX o   r        i-as            requerer
SFX o   r        i-lhe           requerer
SFX o   r        i-lhes          requerer
SFX o   r        i-me            requerer
SFX o   r        i-nos           requerer
SFX o   r        i-o             requerer
SFX o   r        i-os            requerer
SFX o   r        i-se            requerer
SFX o   r        i-te            requerer
SFX o   r        i-vos           requerer
SFX o   r        m-lhe           requerer
SFX o   r        m-lhes          requerer
SFX o   r        m-me            requerer
SFX o   r        m-na            requerer
SFX o   r        m-nas           requerer
SFX o   r        m-no            requerer
SFX o   r        m-nos           requerer
SFX o   r        m-se            requerer
SFX o   r        m-te            requerer
SFX o   r        m-vos           requerer
SFX o   r        mo-nos          requerer
SFX o   r        mos-vos          requerer
SFX o   r        mos-lhe         requerer
SFX o   r        mos-lhes        requerer
SFX o   r        mos-te          requerer
SFX o   r        ndo-a           requerer
SFX o   r        ndo-as          requerer
SFX o   r        ndo-lhe         requerer
SFX o   r        ndo-lhes        requerer
SFX o   r        ndo-me          requerer
SFX o   r        ndo-nos         requerer
SFX o   r        ndo-o           requerer
SFX o   r        ndo-os          requerer
SFX o   r        ndo-se          requerer
SFX o   r        ndo-te          requerer
SFX o   r        ndo-vos         requerer
SFX o   0        a-a             requerer
SFX o   0        a-as            requerer
SFX o   0        a-lhe           requerer
SFX o   0        a-lhes          requerer
SFX o   0        a-me            requerer
SFX o   0        a-nos           requerer
SFX o   0        a-o             requerer
SFX o   0        a-os            requerer
SFX o   0        a-se            requerer
SFX o   0        a-te            requerer
SFX o   0        a-vos           requerer
SFX o   0        -la-á           requerer
SFX o   0        -las-á          requerer
SFX o   0        -lhe-á          requerer
SFX o   0        -lhes-á         requerer
SFX o   0        -lo-á           requerer
SFX o   0        -los-á          requerer
SFX o   0        -me-á           requerer
SFX o   0        -nos-á          requerer
SFX o   0        -se-á           requerer
SFX o   0        -te-á           requerer
SFX o   0        -vos-á          requerer
SFX o   0        am-lhe          requerer
SFX o   0        am-lhes         requerer
SFX o   0        am-me           requerer
SFX o   0        am-na           requerer
SFX o   0        am-nas          requerer
SFX o   0        am-no           requerer
SFX o   0        am-nos          requerer
SFX o   0        am-se           requerer
SFX o   0        am-te           requerer
SFX o   0        am-vos          requerer
SFX o   er       êramo-nos       requerer
SFX o   er       êramos-vos       requerer
SFX o   er       êramos-lhe      requerer
SFX o   er       êramos-lhes     requerer
SFX o   er       êramos-te       requerer
SFX o   0        -lhe-ão         requerer
SFX o   0        -lhes-ão        requerer
SFX o   0        -me-ão          requerer
SFX o   0        -na-ão          requerer
SFX o   0        -nas-ão         requerer
SFX o   0        -no-ão          requerer
SFX o   0        -nos-ão         requerer
SFX o   0        -se-ão          requerer
SFX o   0        -te-ão          requerer
