data/spelling-dict/hunspell/pt_BR.dic
acerear/eoYMjL
acumear/eoYMjL
afeitear/eoYMjL
afomear/eoYMjL
agulhear/eoYMjL
alboguear/eoYMjL
alfinetear/eoYMjL
alicercear/eoYMjL
altanear/eoYjL
amiudar/eoYMJj
apadrear/eoYMjLÂ
apoiar/eoYMjLÂ
arquear/eoYMjLÀÂ
arroiar/eoYMjL
assaloiar/eoYMjL
aurorear/eoYMjL
badelear/eoYMjL
balancear/eoYMjLÀÂÓ
balhestear/eoYMjL
bancarrotear/eoYMjL
bandurrear/eoYMjL
baratear/eoYMjLò
barlaventear/eoYMjL
barretear/eoYMjL
basteirear/eoYMjL
beiradear/eoYMjL
bigodear/eoYMjL
blasonear/eoYMjL
bolandear/eoYMjL
bonancear/eoYMjL
bosear/eoYMjL
braguear/eoYMjL
brasear/eoYMjL
bronquear/eoYMjL
bruxulear/eoYMjL
burlesquear/eoYMjL
cabrear/eoYMjLÂ
caçapear/eoYMjL
cachetear/eoYMjL
calafatear/eoYMjL
calear/eoYMjL
cambetear/eoYMjL
canavear/eoYMjLò
canhonear/eoYMjLò
capear/eoYMjLÀ
caracolear/eoYMjL
carear/eoYjLò
carnavalear/eoYMjL
carrapatear/eoYMjL
cascarrear/eoYMjL
cassear/eoYMjL
catear/eoYjL
cear/eoYMjLÀ
chacotear/eoYjL
champorrear/eoYMjL
chapear/eoYMjL
charquear/eoYjL
chibantear/eoYMjL
chimarrear/eoYMjL
chiripear/eoYMjL
chufear/eoYMjL
ciceronear/eoYMjL
clampear/eoYMjL
coicear/eoYMjLò
colobrear/eoYMjL
conceitear/eoYMjL
coquetear/eoYMjL
cornear/eoYjLò
corvetear/eoYMjL
covear/eoYMjL
cristear/eoYMjL
cursear/eoYMjL
debrear/eoYMjL
dentear/eoYjL
desencobrear/eoYMjL
despetalear/eoYMjL
dissaborear/eoYMjL
droguear/eoYMjL
emastear/eoYMjLÂ
embolear/eoYMjL
embustear/eoYMjL
empear/eoYMjL
empolear/eoYMjLÂ
encasquear/eoYMjLÂ
enfear/eoYMjL
engalanear/eoYMjL
engradear/eoYMjL
enredear/eoYMjL
ensopear/eoYMjL
entressemear/eoYMjL
esbambear/eoYMjL
esborrotear/eoYMjL
escadear/eoYMjL
escandear/eoYMjL
escarapantear/eoYMjL
escarpatear/eoYMjL
escodear/eoYMjL
escornear/eoYMjL
escrupulear/eoYMjL
esfomear/eoYjL
esgazear/eoYMjL
esmear/eoYMjL
espanquear/eoYMjL
espoletear/eoYMjL
espumear/eoYMjL
estear/eoYMjL
estontear/eoYMjL
estroinear/eoYMjL
facetear/eoYMjL
falsetear/eoYMjL
faquear/eoYMjLò
farronquear/eoYMjL
fatagear/eoYMjL
ferropear/eoYMjL
flanquear/eoYMjL
foguear/eoYMjL
folhetear/eoYMjL
forquear/eoYMjL
fotear/eoYMjL
fragatear/eoYMjL
franguear/eoYMjL
frautear/eoYMjL
frontear/eoYMjL
fumacear/eoYMjL
gaitear/eoYMjL
galear/eoYMjL
galponear/eoYMjL
gangorrear/eoYMjL
gargalhadear/eoYMjL
garotear/eoYMjL
garrulear/eoYMjL
gatear/eoYMjLÀ
gear/eoYMjL
gigantear/eoYMjLò
gorjear/eoYMjLÀ
gralhear/eoYMjL
gratear/eoYMjL
graxear/eoYMjL
guasquear/eoYjL
haraganear/eoYMjL
hidromassagear/eoYjL
janotear/eoYMjL
jatear/eoYMjLÀ
lacear/eoYMjL
lajear/eoYMjLÂ
lambetear/eoYMjL
lapear/eoYMjL
larear/eoYMjL
latear/eoYMjL
ler/eoMjL2À
lombear/eoYMjL
louquear/eoYMjLÀ
machear/eoYMjL
malandrear/eoYMjL
mambembear/eoYMjL
manetear/eoYMjL
manosear/eoYMjLò
manusear/eoYMjLÀ
marchantear/eoYMjL
marombear/eoYMjL
mastrear/eoYjLÂ
maturranguear/eoYMjL
mentorear/eoYMjL
metamorfosear/eoYMjL
minudear/eoYMjL
mocozear/eoYMjL
momear/eoYMjL
moribundear/eoYMjL
muquear/eoYMjL
nausear/eoYMjL
nordestear/eoYMjLò
odiar/eoYMjL
ondear/eoYMjL
ozear/eoYMjL
pajear/eoYMjLò
palermear/eoYMjL
palmetear/eoYMjL
pandear/eoYMjL
paparrotear/eoYMjL
paracletear/eoYMjL
parcear/eoYMjL
parlapatear/eoYjL
pasquinear/eoYMjL
pastorear/eoYM
patentear/eoYMjL
pautear/eoYjL
pecorear/eoYMjL
peleguear/eoYMjL
pensamentear/eoYMjL
perder/eoMbjLÀ
pernear/eoYMjL
perrear/eoYMjLò
pestear/eoYMjLò
petrolear/eoYMjL
pimponear/eoYMjL
pipoquear/eoYMjL
pirilampear/eoYMjL
pixear/eoYMjL
pleitear/eoYMjL
polmear/eoYMjL
pombear/eoYjL
pontear/eoYjLÂÓò
postear/eoYjL
prantear/eoYMjL
preguicear/eoYMjL
pretear/eoYMjL
protasear/eoYMjL
pulsear/eoYMjL
putear/eoYjL
rabear/eoYjL
racear/eoYMjL
rancear/eoYMjL
rasquear/eoYjL
ratonear/eoYMjL
recadear/eoYMjL
redomonear/eoYjL
remansear/eoYMjL
requerer/eoMjL
respaldear/eoYMjL
romanear/eoYMjL
rouxinolear/eoYMjL
saguatear/eoYMjL
sapear/eoYjL
saudar/eoYjLÂÀ
serrear/eoYMjL
sochantrear/eoYMjL
soquear/eoYMjL
surdear/eoYMjL
tagantear/eoYMjL
taramelear/eoYMjL
tastear/eoYMjL
terracear/eoYMjL
titerear/eoYjL
tornear/eoYMjL
trampear/eoYMjL
trastear/eoYMjL
tresler/eoMjL
trompetear/eoYMjL
tupenear/eoYMjL
vagamundear/eoYjL
vaquear/eoYMjL
vergontear/eoYMjL
voltear/eoYjLÀ
zangarrear/eoYMjL
zonzonear/eoYM
